Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2033.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 57 of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER DCORRECTIONAL INSTITUTIONSSec.5750. Definitions.5751. Health and safety requirements.5752. Health and safety inspections.5753. Rules and regulations.5754. Construction of subchapter.§ 5750. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter 123456789101112131415161718 shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Correctional institution." A State correctional institution or a county correctional institution."County correctional institution." A correctional facility, prison or jail owned or operated by a county."Federal acts." As defined under section 5722 (relating to definitions)."State correctional institution." A correctional facility, prison or jail owned or operated by the Commonwealth.§ 5751. Health and safety requirements.Correctional institutions shall, at a minimum, develop and utilize local policies and procedures that are in keeping with existing State law and recognized professional standards, including the following requirements:(1) Food shall be prepared and served in a sanitary manner.(2) Food preparation areas and food distribution areas shall be maintained in a safe and clean condition at all times.(3) Food shall be stored and prepared in a proper manner to ensure freshness and to prevent spoilage and damage from insects and rodents.(4) Appropriate food service head cover, beard and facial hair cover and gloves shall be worn by staff, food service contractors and inmates engaged in food preparation or distribution or both.(5) At least one supervisory food service employee shall be certified in food safety and sanitation in accordance with Chapter 65 (relating to food employee certification).20250HB2033PN2604 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) A person in charge shall always be present during all hours of operations. If the person in charge is not certified, the person in charge shall receive documented training as to the food safety and sanitation procedures established by written local policy.(7) Food handlers must wash their hands upon reporting to duty and after using toilet facilities.(8) Eating and drinking utensils shall be cleaned, rinsed and sanitized before being reissued to another inmate.(9) Food shall be served as promptly as possible and at the proper temperature.§ 5752. Health and safety inspections.(a) Inspection.--The department shall have the power and duty to:(1) Enter a correctional institution at reasonable times.(2) Inspect the correctional institution at reasonable times, within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner.(3) Obtain a sample of any food at a correctional institution for analysis as may be necessary to determine the safety of the food, water and kitchens and the compliance with the minimum health and safety requirements under section 5751 (relating to health and safety requirements).(b) Report of inspection.--(1) Upon completion of an inspection of a correctional institution and prior to leaving the premises, the secretary shall provide to the person in charge a written report of the findings of the inspection.(2) Inspection reports shall be published on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.20250HB2033PN2604 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Interagency coordination.--The department shall share inspection reports or test results that indicate human illness related to food consumption or food handling practices, or to other threats to the safety of the food supply, with the Department of Health, the Department of Environmental Protection, the Department of Corrections or any other Commonwealth agency as necessary to develop a comprehensive, coordinated interagency approach to protecting public health and safeguarding the food supply.(d) Interagency compliance.--The Department of Corrections and county correctional administrators shall cooperate with inspections under this subchapter and provide any information requested by the department in relation to an inspection under this section.§ 5753. Rules and regulations.(a) Nature of rules.--The secretary shall be charged with the enforcement of this subchapter and shall promulgate rules, regulations and food standards necessary for its proper enforcement. The rules, regulations and food standards shall conform and shall be construed to conform with the purposes expressed in section 5754 (relating to construction of subchapter).(b) Adoption of Federal regulations.--All regulations adopted under the Federal acts that relate to food on, before or after the effective date of this subchapter are adopted as regulations in this Commonwealth and shall remain in effect unless subsequently modified or superseded by regulations promulgated by the secretary.(c) Water standards. -- If a correctional institution uses or supplies water for human consumption, the water shall be in 20250HB2033PN2604 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compliance with the primary and secondary Maximum Contaminant Levels, treatment techniques and Maximum Residual Disinfectant Levels required by the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, and its attendant regulations.§ 5754. Construction of subchapter.( a) Construction.--The pro visions of this subchapter and the regulations promulgated under this subchapter shall be construed in a manner that is consistent with Federal acts and regulations promulgated under those acts. The secretary shall not ordain or enforce requirements relating to sanitation, food safety, food standards and labeling requirements of any kind or description other than those provided for in Federal acts unless the proposed regulation meets all of the following:(1) is justified by compelling and unique local conditions;(2) protects an important public interest that would otherwise be unprotected;(3) relates to subject matter that is primarily local in nature and the Federal agency with responsibility over the subject matter is not exercising its jurisdiction with respect to the subject matter;(4) would not cause a food to be in violation of any applicable requirements under a Federal act; and(5) would not unduly burden interstate commerce.(b) Secretary to participate in rulemaking.--The secretary is encouraged to participate in rulemaking under Federal acts and, if necessary, to pursue Federal rulemaking as is deemed necessary for the protection of the residents of this Commonwealth through the Federal petition and rulemaking 20250HB2033PN2604 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 process.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2033PN2604 - 6 - 12